Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 6. Federal Aid

Joint resolution. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., Senate Joint Resolution No. 3, §§ 1 to 4, requests Congress to direct all federal authorities responsible for wolf reintroduction in the state to manage wolves so that the elk, moose and deer population, moose and deer habitats and elk feeding grounds are preserved and to annually reimburse the state for the loss of elk, moose and deer to wolves.

§ 23-1-601.
Assent to and cooperation with federal wildlife restoration projects; funds from license fees not to be diverted.

The state assents to the provisions of the act of congress entitled “An act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in wildlife-restoration projects, and for other purposes,” approved September 2, 1937 (Public Law No. 415, 75th congress) [16 U.S.C. §§ 669 to 669i]. The commission is authorized to perform such lawful acts as may be necessary in its opinion to the conduct and establishment of cooperative wildlife restoration projects in Wyoming as defined in and in compliance with the preceding act of congress. Hunter license fees may only be used for the administration of the department and commission, and for the protection, propagation, preservation, and investigation of fish and game.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-21.

§ 23-1-602.
Assent to and cooperation with federal fish restoration projects; funds from license fees not to be diverted.

The state assents to the provisions of the act of congress entitled “An act to provide that the United States shall aid the states in fish restoration and management projects, and for other purposes,” 16 U.S.C. §§ 777 through 777m. The commission is authorized to perform such lawful acts as may be necessary in its opinion to the conduct and establishment of cooperative fish restoration projects as defined in and in compliance with the preceding act of congress. Fishermen license fees may only be used for the administration of the department and commission, and for the protection, propagation, preservation, and investigation of fish and game.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-22; Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “16 U.S.C. §§ 777 through 777m” for “approved August 9, 1950 (Public Law 681, 81st congress).”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 23-1-603.
Authorization to transfer conservation stamp receipts to game and fish fund.

To the extent allowed by W.S.

23-1-601

and

23-1-602

, the game and fish commission may, from time to time, transfer conservation stamp receipts to the general operating account within the game and fish fund.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 175, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to conservation stamps, see §

23-2-306

.

As to game and fish fund, see §

9-4-204

.